Washington statutes.
RCW 19.170.050

Simulated checks—Continuing obligation checks—Notice.

(1) No person may produce, advertise, offer for sale, sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer for use in this state a simulated check unless the document bears the phrase "THIS IS NOT A CHECK," diagonally printed in type at least as large as the predominant typeface in the simulated check on the front of the check itself.

(2) No person, other than a financial institution, may produce, advertise, offer for sale, sell, distribute, or otherwise transfer for use in this state a continuing obligation check unless the document bears the phrase "THIS IS A LOAN" or "CASHING THIS REQUIRES REPAYMENT," diagonally printed in type at least as large as the predominant typeface in the continuing obligation check on the front of the check itself.

[ 1991 c 227 s 5.]